Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2072.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XXVI-MTUITION WAIVER FOR NATIVE AMERICAN STUDENTSSection 2601-M. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." An eligible student who applies for a tuition waiver."Department." The Department of Education of the 1234567891011121314151617181920 Commonwealth."Eligible student." A student who is attending or has been accepted to attend an institution of higher education and who is an active member of an eligible tribe."Eligible tribe." A Native American tribe that was originally located on the land that is now this Commonwealth or that had members who were enrolled at the Carlisle Industrial Indian School as determined by the department."Institution of higher education." An institution as defined in section 2001-A."Program." The Tuition Waiver for Native American Students Program established by this article.Section 2602-M. Tuition Waiver for Native American Students Program.(a) Establishment.--The Tuition Waiver for Native American Students Program is established in the department. Beginning with the first fall semester following the effective date of this section, an institution of higher education shall waive tuition for an eligible student who qualifies for admission.(b) Eligibility.--To qualify for a tuition waiver, an applicant must:(1) Submit an application to an institution of higher education.(2) Be enrolled as a full-time or part-time student at the institution of higher education.(3) Be an active member of an eligible tribe on the list published under section 2603-M.Section 2603-M. List of eligible tribes.The department shall:(1) Develop a list of eligible tribes within 30 days of 20250HB2072PN2655 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the effective date of this section.(2) Publish the list of eligible tribes on its publicly accessible Internet website within 30 days of the development of the list.Section 2604-M. Outreach.(a) Duties of department.--The department shall by January 1, 2026, and each January 1 thereafter, prepare and provide information for dissemination by the department and institutions of higher education that:(1) Describes the availability of the program.(2) Explains how to participate in the program.(b) Duties of institutions of higher education.--An institution of higher education shall:(1) Provide technical assistance to eligible students under section 2602-M(b) in completing admissions applications and financial aid applications.(2) Post the information prepared under subsection (a) on the institution of higher education's publicly accessible Internet website.(3) To improve retention, report to the department by June 30, 2027, and each June 30 thereafter, all of the following:(i) The number of students who apply for the program.(ii) The number of eligible students participating in the program.(iii) The retention rates of eligible students participating in the program.(iv) The number of eligible students who are participating in the program and have unmet financial 20250HB2072PN2655 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 need.(v) Recommendations on how to improve outreach to students who are or are potentially eligible for the program.(vi) Recommendations on ways in which to improve the delivery of services to eligible students under section 2602-M(b).(vii) Impediments to retaining eligible students under section 2602-M(b).(c) Limitations.--The department may not require any other information to be provided by an institution of higher education except as provided under subsection (b)(3).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2072PN2655 - 4 - 12345678910111213